Maryland, session 2025, HB0946.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
12–121.
(A) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS
ESTABLISHING UNIFORM STANDARDS FOR BREATHALYZER TECHNOLOGY USED IN
THE STATE.
(2) THE UNIFORM STANDARDS SHALL ENSURE THAT BREATHALYZER
TESTS ADMINISTERED IN THE STATE PROVIDE CONSISTENT, CLEAR, AND RELIABLE
MEASUREMENTS.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0946*

HOUSE BILL 946
(B) ALL BREATHALYZERS USED IN THE STATE ON OR AFTER OCTOBER 1,
2026, SHALL COMPLY WITH THE UNIFORM STANDARDS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.